Arkansas, session 2025, HB1764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-53-134(b), concerning the offense
classification for a violation of an order of protection, is amended to read
as follows:
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section,
violation of an order of protection under this section is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(2) Violation of an order of protection under this section is a
Class D felony if:
(A) The offense is committed within five (5) years of a
previous conviction for violation of an order of protection under this
section or a violation of an equivalent domestic abuse order of protection of
another state or foreign jurisdiction; and
(B) The order of protection was issued after a hearing of
which the person received actual notice and at which the person had an
opportunity to participate.

/s/Underwood

*CEB127*
04-02-2025 10:24:21 CEB127